Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.070

Exchange of tidelands with private or public landowners.

(1) The department of fish and wildlife may exchange the tidelands and shorelands it manages with private or public landowners if the exchange is in the public interest.

(2) As used in this section, an exchange of tidelands and shorelands is in the public interest if the exchange would provide significant fish and wildlife habitat or public access to the state's waterways.

[ 1997 c 209 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—1997 c 209: "The legislature finds that the department of fish and wildlife manages a large amount of public land and that the department may have opportunities to improve the quality of its landholdings by participating in an exchange with private landowners or other public entities. The legislature declares that it is in the public interest to allow the department to exchange land with private landowners or with public entities if the exchange would provide significant fish and wildlife habitat or public access to the state's waterways." [ 1997 c 209 s 1.]

Effective date—1997 c 209: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 25, 1997]." [ 1997 c 209 s 4.]